Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.210

Payment may be directed based on contract.

The prosecutor or the department may, at any time after the person's arraignment petition any superior court for an order, following notice and hearing, directing that any contract described in RCW 7.68.200 shall be paid in accordance with RCW 7.68.200 through 7.68.280.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.